Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-216
Special elections; authorized; regulation.

A city of the first class may provide for the holding and regulation of special elections, the return and canvass of votes cast thereat, and pay the expenses of the same.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, XXI, p. 250;

R.S.1913, § 4832;

C.S.1922, § 4000;

C.S.1929, § 16-217;

R.S.1943, § 16-216.

In absence of a limitation in the act granting it authority to issue bonds, the city has power to levy sufficient taxes to pay the same, and a judgment against the city for the amount of the bonds puts the question of authority to levy the tax to pay such bonds to rest, and mandamus will enforce such levy. United States ex rel. Masslich v. Saunders, 124 F. 124 (8th Cir. 1903).